test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_tuhhid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: salkkii
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: sälkkejoon
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: sälkkejee
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: sälkkejop
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: salkkiđ
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: salkkii
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: salkkiiččii
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: salkkiižii
    salkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: [sälkkejeijee, sälkkejijjee]
    salkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Nom: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: salkkiimin
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: salkkiimist
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: salkkiimân
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Com: salkkiidijn
    salkkiđ+V+VAbess: salkkiihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - luoddiđ: # MLO, checked
    luoddiđ+V+Inf: luoddiđ
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoddiim
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luoddiih
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lyeddee
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lyeddejeen
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luoddiivettee
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luoddiv
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luoddip
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luoddiivetteđ
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lyeddejeh
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lyeddejim
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lyeddejih
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luoddij
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luoddijm
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luoddijd
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luoddijn
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luoddijm
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luoddijd
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lyeddejii
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luoddiiččim
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: luoddiiččih
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luoddiiččij
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: luoddiiččáim
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: luoddiiččáid
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: luoddiiččáin
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: luoddiiččijm
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: luoddiiččijd
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: luoddiiččii
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: luoddiižeem
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: luoddiižeeh
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luoddiš
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: luoddiižeen
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: luoddišvettee
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: luoddiižává
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: luoddiižep
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: luoddišvetteđ
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: luoddiižeh

    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: luoddii
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lyeddejus
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lyeddejoon
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lyeddejee
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lyeddejus
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: lyeddejop
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: luoddiđ
    luoddiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lyeddejus
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luoddii
    luoddiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luoddim
    luoddiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: luoddiiččii
    luoddiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luoddiižii
    luoddiđ+V+PrsPrc: [lyeddejeijee, lyeddejijjee]
    luoddiđ+V+PrfPrc: luoddim
    luoddiđ+V+Actio+Nom: luoddim
    luoddiđ+V+Actio+Ess: luoddiimin
    luoddiđ+V+Actio+Loc: luoddiimist
    luoddiđ+V+Actio+Ill: luoddiimân
    luoddiđ+V+Actio+Com: luoddiidijn
    luoddiđ+V+VAbess: luoddiihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - toppiđ: # MLO, checked
    toppiđ+V+Inf: toppiđ
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toppiim
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toppiih
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáppee
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuáppejeen
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toppiivettee
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toppiv
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toppip
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: toppiivetteđ
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuáppejeh
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuáppejim
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tuáppejih
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toppij
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: toppijm
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: toppijd
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: toppijn
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toppijm
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toppijd
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuáppejii
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: toppiiččim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: toppiiččih
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: toppiiččij
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: toppiiččáim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: toppiiččáid
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: toppiiččáin
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: toppiiččijm
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: toppiiččijd
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: toppiiččii
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: toppiižeem
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: toppiižeeh
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: toppiš
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: toppiižeen
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: toppišvettee
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: toppiižává
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: toppiižep
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: toppišvetteđ
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: toppiižeh

    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toppii
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tuáppejus
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tuáppejoon
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tuáppejee
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tuáppejus
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tuáppejop
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toppiđ
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tuáppejus
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toppii
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: toppiiččii
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: toppiižii
    toppiđ+V+PrsPrc: [tuáppejeijee, tuáppejijjee]
    toppiđ+V+PrfPrc: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Nom: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Ess: toppiimin
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Loc: toppiimist
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Ill: toppiimân
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Com: toppiidijn
    toppiđ+V+VAbess: toppiihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - monniđ: # MLO, checked
    monniđ+V+Inf: monniđ
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monniim
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: monniih
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mannee
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: mannejeen
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monniivettee
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: monniv
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: monnip
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monniivetteđ
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mannejeh
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mannejim
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mannejih
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monnij
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: monnijm
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: monnijd
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: monnijn
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: monnijm
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: monnijd
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mannejii
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: monniiččim
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: monniiččih
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: monniiččij
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: monniiččáim
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: monniiččáid
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: monniiččáin
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: monniiččijm
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: monniiččijd
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: monniiččii
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: monniižeem
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: monniižeeh
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: monniš
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: monniižeen
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: monnišvettee
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: monniižává
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: monniižep
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: monnišvetteđ
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: monniižeh

    monniđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: monnii
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du1: mannejoon
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du2: mannejee
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: mannejop
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: monniđ
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: monnii
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: monnim
    monniđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: monniiččii
    monniđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: monniižii
    monniđ+V+PrsPrc: [mannejeijee, mannejijjee]
    monniđ+V+PrfPrc: monnim
    monniđ+V+Actio+Nom: monnim
    monniđ+V+Actio+Ess: monniimin
    monniđ+V+Actio+Loc: monniimist
    monniđ+V+Actio+Ill: monniimân
    monniđ+V+Actio+Com: monniidijn
    monniđ+V+VAbess: monniihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - orniđ: # MLO, checked
    orniđ+V+Inf: orniđ
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniim
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: orniih
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uárnee
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uárnejeen
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: orniivettee
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orniv
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ornip
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: orniivetteđ
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uárnejeh
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uárnejim
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uárnejih
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ornij
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ornijm
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ornijd
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ornijn
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ornijm
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ornijd
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uárnejii
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: orniiččim
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: orniiččih
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: orniiččij
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: orniiččáim
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: orniiččáid
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: orniiččáin
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: orniiččijm
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: orniiččijd
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: orniiččii
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: orniižeem
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: orniižeeh
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: orniš
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: orniižeen
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ornišvettee
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: orniižává
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: orniižep
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ornišvetteđ
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: orniižeh

    orniđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ornii
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uárnejus
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uárnejoon
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uárnejee
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uárnejus
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uárnejop
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orniđ
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uárnejus
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ornii
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ornim
    orniđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: orniiččii
    orniđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: orniižii
    orniđ+V+PrsPrc: [uárnejeijee, uárnejijjee]
    orniđ+V+PrfPrc: ornim
    orniđ+V+Actio+Nom: ornim
    orniđ+V+Actio+Ess: orniimin
    orniđ+V+Actio+Loc: orniimist
    orniđ+V+Actio+Ill: orniimân
    orniđ+V+Actio+Com: orniidijn
    orniđ+V+VAbess: orniihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - staaviđ: # MLO, checked
    staaviđ+V+Inf: staaviđ
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: staaviim
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: staaviih
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stäävee
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: stäävejeen
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: staaviivettee
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: staaviv
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: staavip
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: staaviivetteđ
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: stäävejeh
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: stäävejim
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: stäävejih
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: staavij
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: staavijm
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: staavijd
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: staavijn
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: staavijm
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: staavijd
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: stäävejii
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: staaviiččim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: staaviiččih
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: staaviiččij
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: staaviiččáim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: staaviiččáid
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: staaviiččáin
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: staaviiččijm
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: staaviiččijd
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: staaviiččii
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: staaviižeem
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: staaviižeeh
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: staaviš      
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: staaviižeen
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: staavišvettee     
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: staaviižává
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: staaviižep
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: staavišvetteđ      
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: staaviižeh
